Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.14
State Building Administrator; bond or insurance.

The administrator shall, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. The premium shall be paid by the state.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 34;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 43.